Arkansas, session 2025, HB1803.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1125(e)(2), as amended by Acts 2025,
No. 251, concerning the Arkansas Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial
Preservation Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Before the expenditure of any moneys from the Arkansas
Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial Preservation Fund for the maintenance,
repair, alteration, addition, reconstruction, or upkeep of any kind for a
specific monument or memorial areas on State Capitol grounds, if there is a
fund dedicated to that specific monument or memorial, the Secretary of State
shall utilize the gifts, grants, and donations made to the following funds
for the maintenance, repair, alteration, addition, reconstruction, or upkeep
of that specific monument or memorial:
(A) Vietnam Veterans Monument Fund;
(B) Arkansas Military War Veterans Monument Fund;
*LGL148*
04-01-2025 10:30:41 LGL148

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 HB1803
(C) Ten Commandments Monument Display Act under § 22-3-
221;
(D) Gold Star Family Memorial Monument Fund;
(E) Arkansas Fallen Firefighters Memorial Board under §
22-3-1704; and
(F) Hoxie: The First Stand Memorial Monument Fund.; and
(G) Maurice Lee "Footsie" Britt Memorial Bust Fund.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 11, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1162. Maurice Lee "Footsie" Britt Memorial Bust Fund.
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the "Maurice Lee "Footsie" Britt Memorial Bust Fund".
(b) The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, and donations from
individuals and organizations as provided under the Maurice Lee "Footsie"
Britt Memorial Bust Act, § 22-3-225, and other funds as may be provided by
law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting and
maintaining a suitable monument on the State Capitol grounds in recognition
and honor of Maurice Lee "Footsie" Britt, as provided in the Maurice Lee
"Footsie" Britt Memorial Bust Act, § 22-3-225.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 22, Chapter 3, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
22-3-225. Maurice Lee “Footsie” Britt Memorial Bust.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Maurice Lee
“Footsie” Britt Memorial Bust Act.”
(b)(1) The Secretary of State shall permit and arrange for the
placement in the State Capitol of a memorial bust commemorating the courage,
honor, and sacrifice of Maurice Lee "Footsie" Britt both in war and in life.
(2) The bust shall be placed on the second floor of the State
Capitol Building in proximity to the existing bust of Winthrop Rockefeller.
(3)(A) The bust shall be designed and sculpted in a manner
similar to the existing busts located in the State Capitol Building.
(B) The Secretary of State, through consultation with the
04-01-2025 10:30:41 LGL148

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 HB1803
Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission, shall approve:
(i) The artist selected to design the bust;
(ii) The final design of the bust; and
(iii) The exact location of the bust.
(C) The Secretary of State may accept gifts, grants, and
donations from individuals and organizations to be deposited as trust funds
into the Maurice Lee "Footsie" Britt Memorial Bust Fund.

/s/Joey Carr



























04-01-2025 10:30:41 LGL148